Nebraska, session 109, LB1203.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1203 LB1203
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Each county treasurer and county clerk shall
maintain a list of checks issued by his or her office that remain
uncashed after two years, including the amount of the check and the name
of the person to whom the check was issued.
(2) Any such check for an amount of less than one hundred dollars
shall be void three years after the date of its issuance and shall cease
to be an obligation of the county at such time. Such check may thereafter
be presented to the county board of such county which may approve the
claim for payment.
(3) Any check that is void pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section shall be charged off upon the books of the county, and the county
treasurer shall credit the money, including any interest thereon, to the
general fund of such county.
(4) Any check that is void pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section shall cease to be intangible personal property held for the owner
and shall not be subject to the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property
Act.
-2-